Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.025

License required to practice podiatric medicine and surgery.

No person may practice or represent himself or herself as a podiatric physician and surgeon without first applying for and receiving a license under this chapter to practice podiatric medicine and surgery.

[ 1990 c 147 s 7.]